Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-4,157
Driving skills examination; waiver
based on third-party tester;
licensure in another state; report of examination results.

(1) A commercial
driver's license examiner may waive the driving skills examination when an
applicant presents evidence, on a form to be prescribed by the director, that
he or she has successfully passed a driving skills examination administered
by a third-party tester.

(2) A third-party skills
test examiner may administer a driving skills examination to an applicant
who has taken training in this state but is to be licensed in another state.
The driving skills examination results shall be reported by the third-party
skills test examiner to the department. The department shall transmit electronically
the driving skills examination results directly from this state to the licensing
state in an efficient and secure manner to be determined by the director.

(3) A third-party skills
test examiner who is also a skills instructor either as part of a school,
training program, or otherwise is prohibited from administering a skills test
to an applicant who received skills training by that skills test examiner.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 107;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 43.